California, session 20252026, SB903.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 13.6 (commencing with Section 4989.80) is added to Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 13.6. Wellness and Oversight for Psychological Resources Act4989.80. This chapter may be cited as the Wellness and Oversight for Psychological Resources Act.4989.81. The purpose of this chapter is to safeguard individuals seeking psychotherapy services by ensuring these services are delivered by licensed professionals. This chapter is intended to protect consumers from unlicensed or unqualified providers, including unregulated artificial intelligence systems, while respecting individual choice and access to community-based and faith-based mental health support and recognizing that artificial intelligence technology has the potential to expand clinical capacity if used in a safe, ethical, and legal manner.4989.82. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Administrative support” means tasks performed to assist a licensed professional in the delivery of psychotherapy services that do not involve psychotherapeutic communication. “Administrative support” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Managing appointment scheduling and reminders.(2) Processing billing and insurance claims.(3) Drafting general communications related to therapy logistics that do not include therapeutic advice.(b) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(c) “Companion chatbot” has the same meaning as in Section 22601. (c)(d) (1) “Consent” means a clear, explicit affirmative act by an individual that meets both of the following requirements:(A) Unambiguously communicates the individual’s express, informed, and voluntary agreement, either verbally or in writing, and documented in the record.(B) Is revocable by the individual.(2) “Consent” does not include an agreement that is obtained by any of the following:(A) The acceptance of a general or broad terms of use agreement or a similar document that contains descriptions of artificial intelligence along with other information unrelated to the privacy of medical information.(B) An individual hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of digital content.(C) An agreement obtained through the use of deceptive actions.(d)(e) “Licensed professional” means any of the following:(1) A person authorized to practice medicine in this state who devotes, or is reasonably believed by the patient to devote, a substantial portion of their time to the practice of psychiatry.(2) A person licensed as a psychologist under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).(3) A person licensed as a clinical social worker under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), when they are engaged in applied psychotherapy of a nonmedical nature.(4) A person who is serving as a school psychologist and holds a credential authorizing that service issued by the state.(5) A person licensed as a marriage and family therapist under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980).(6) A person registered as a registered psychological associate who is under the supervision of a licensed psychologist as required by Section 2913, or a person registered as an associate marriage and family therapist who is under the supervision of a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed educational psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, or a licensed physician and surgeon certified in psychiatry, as specified in Section 4980.44. subdivision (g) of Section 4980.03.(7) A person registered as an associate clinical social worker who is under supervision as specified in Section 4996.23.(8) A psychological trainee, as defined in Section 2911, who is under the primary supervision of a licensed psychologist.(9) A marriage and family therapist trainee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4980.03, who is fulfilling their supervised practicum required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4980.36 or subdivision (c) of Section 4980.37 and is supervised by a licensed psychologist, a board-certified psychiatrist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed professional clinical counselor. marriage and family therapist, a licensed educational psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, or a licensed physician and surgeon certified in psychiatry, as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 4980.03.(10) A person licensed as a registered nurse pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) who possesses a master’s degree in psychiatric-mental health nursing and is listed as a psychiatric-mental health nurse by the Board of Registered Nursing.(11) An advanced practice registered nurse who is certified as a clinical nurse specialist pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 2838) of Chapter 6 and who participates in expert clinical practice in the specialty of psychiatric-mental health nursing.(12) A person rendering mental health treatment or counseling services as authorized pursuant to Section 6924 of the Family Code.(13) A person licensed as a professional clinical counselor under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10).(14) A person registered as an associate professional clinical counselor who is under the supervision of a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed psychologist, or a licensed physician and surgeon certified in psychiatry, as specified in Sections 4999.42 to 4999.48, inclusive. subdivision (h) of Section 4999.12.(15) A clinical counselor trainee, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4999.12, who is fulfilling their supervised practicum required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.32 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 4999.33 and is supervised by a licensed psychologist, a board-certified psychiatrist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed professional clinical counselor. 4999.33.(16) A licensed educational psychologist.(17) A social work intern.(18) An advanced practice registered nurse who is certified as a nurse practitioner pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) of Chapter 6 and who holds a national certification by an organization accredited by the National Commission for Certifying Agencies or the Accreditation Board for Specialty Nursing Certification as a psychiatric-mental health nurse practitioner across the lifespan.(e)(f) “Peer support” means services provided by individuals with lived experience of mental health conditions or recovery from substance use disorders that are intended to offer encouragement, understanding, and guidance without clinical intervention.(f)(g) (1) “Psychotherapeutic communication” means any verbal, nonverbal, or written interaction in a clinical or professional setting that is conducted for the purpose of diagnosing or treating a mental health or substance use disorder or concern. “Psychotherapeutic communication” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(A) Direct interactions with patients or clients for the purpose of diagnosing or treating a mental health or substance use disorder or concern.(B) Providing guidance, therapeutic strategies, or interventions designed to achieve mental health outcomes.(C) Collaborating with patients or clients to develop or modify therapeutic goals or treatment plans for a mental health or substance use disorder or concern.(2) “Psychotherapeutic communication” does not include general wellness education, instruction, or guidance that is intended to promote overall health and well-being rather than to diagnose or treat a specific mental, emotional, or behavioral health disorder or concern.(g)(h) “Psychotherapy services” means services provided to diagnose, diagnose or treat an individual’s mental health or substance use disorder. “Psychotherapy services” does not include religious counseling or peer support.(h)(i) “Religious counseling” means counseling provided by clergy members, pastoral counselors, or other religious leaders acting within the scope of their religious duties if the services are explicitly faith based and are not represented as clinical mental health services or psychotherapy services.(i)(j) “Supplementary support” means tasks performed to assist a licensed professional in the delivery of psychotherapy services that do not involve psychotherapeutic communication and that are not administrative support. “Supplementary support” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1) Preparing and maintaining patient or client records, including psychotherapy and progress notes.(2) Analyzing data to track patient or client progress or identify trends, reviewed by a licensed professional.(3) Identifying and organizing external resources or referrals for patient or client use.(4) Using artificial intelligence tools that assist licensed professionals with documentation, workflow management, or other functions that enhance clinical capacity, provided the licensed professional maintains responsibility for all clinical decisions and communications.(j)(k) “Triage or screening” means the assessment of an individual’s health concerns and symptoms for the purpose of determining the urgency, clinical nature, or appropriate level of the individual’s need for psychotherapy services.(k)“Use of artificial intelligence” means the use of artificial intelligence tools or systems to assist in providing administrative support or supplementary support in psychotherapy services.4989.83.(a)An 4989.83. (a) An individual, corporation, or entity that provides or facilitates psychotherapy services may use artificial intelligence tools or systems only to assist in providing administrative support or supplementary support in psychotherapy services, provided that those activities are carried out in a manner consistent with this chapter and any other applicable law.(b) An individual, corporation, or entity shall not use artificial intelligence to record or transcribe psychotherapeutic communications, psychotherapy sessions, or triage or screening unless both of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The patient or client, or the patient’s or client’s legally authorized representative, is informed verbally or in writing of both of the following:(A) That artificial intelligence will be used.(B) The specific purpose of the artificial intelligence tool or system that will be used.(2) The patient or client, or the patient’s or client’s legally authorized representative, provides consent to the use of artificial intelligence.(b)(c) A patient does not surrender any of their rights to care if the patient or their legally authorized representative does not provide consent to artificial intelligence being used to record or transcribe psychotherapeutic communications, psychotherapy sessions, or triage or screening.4989.84. (a) An individual, corporation, or entity shall not advertise or otherwise purport to offer psychotherapy services when the services are provided through the use of companion chatbots. This includes by claiming the companion chatbot is a therapist or provides therapy.(b) When providing used in connection with the provision of psychotherapy services or conducting triage or screening, an individual, corporation, or entity may use artificial intelligence only to the extent the use meets the requirements of this chapter and shall not allow artificial intelligence to do any of the following: shall not allow artificial intelligence to do any of the following without review and approval by a licensed professional:(1) Make independent therapeutic decisions.(2) Directly interact with patients or clients in any form of psychotherapeutic communication, unless the tool or system is approved or cleared by the United States Food and Drug Administration for that use and is compliant with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).(3) Generate therapeutic recommendations, assessment results, diagnoses, or treatment plans without review and approval by the licensed professional. plans.(4) Detect emotions or mental states.(5)Assess an individual’s health concerns or symptoms for the purpose of determining the urgency, clinical nature, or appropriate level of the individual’s need for psychotherapy services.(5) Perform triage or screening.(c) If a licensed professional uses artificial intelligence in connection with psychotherapy services or triage or screening and the use has not been selected, provided, directed, or mandated by an employing or contracting entity, screening, the licensed professional shall be responsible for both of the following: ensuring the licensed professional and anyone under their supervision uses the artificial intelligence in a manner that is clinically appropriate and compliant with this chapter.(1)Ensuring the artificial intelligence is deployed in compliance with this chapter.(2)Ensuring the artificial intelligence is used in a clinically appropriate manner.(d) If a licensed professional uses artificial intelligence required or authorized by their employer or contracting entity, the following shall apply: employer or contracting entity shall be responsible for both of the following:(1)The employer or contracting entity shall be responsible for both of the following:(A)(1) Ensuring the artificial intelligence is deployed in compliance with this chapter.(B)(2) Directing the licensed professional to use the artificial intelligence in compliance with this chapter.(2)The licensed professional shall use artificial intelligence in a clinically appropriate manner.4989.85. Use of artificial intelligence in patient or client records for psychotherapy services shall comply with the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code). A company or entity shall not share, sell, store, or train their models on any data obtained from psychotherapy in a manner inconsistent with any applicable law.4989.86. (a) A violation of this chapter is subject to the jurisdiction of the appropriate health care professional licensing board or enforcement agency.(b) The appropriate health care professional licensing board may pursue an injunction or restraining order to enforce the provisions of this chapter, as authorized by Section 125.5.(c) This section does not limit the authority of a health care professional licensing board or enforcement agency to pursue any remedy otherwise authorized by law.(d) The appropriate health care professional licensing boards may adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter.4989.87. This chapter does not apply to any of the following:(a) Religious counseling.(b) Peer support.(c) Self-help materials and educational resources that are available to the public and do not purport to offer psychotherapy services.(d) Artificial intelligence used solely for training or simulation purposes.(e) Research, as defined in Section 164.501 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, conducted by an academic or nonprofit research institution that is conducted in accordance with applicable ethics, confidentiality, privacy, and security rules of Part 164 (commencing with Section 164.102) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects, also known as the Common Rule, good clinical practice guidelines issued by the International Council for Harmonisation, Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for Human Use, or human subject protection requirements of the United States Food and Drug Administration.(f)Any artificial intelligence tool or system that has been reviewed and cleared, authorized, or approved for use by the United States Food and Drug Administration, or another federal agency tasked with approving artificial intelligence for use in health care, provided the tool or system is used consistent with its approved indication and applicable federal requirements.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.